src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON SHORTCOMP_PREDNVD !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%> K ; ! 
 ATTRCONT ;


LEXICON EABBU !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom:»X6ž K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X6žin K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6ž%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen:»X6ža K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:»X6ž K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6ž%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc:»X6ža K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:»X6ž K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6ž%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6žat K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žasa%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill:»X6žij K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc:»X6žis K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:»X6žin K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com:»X6žijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Use/Sub:»X6žijnna K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X6žijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+PlGenCmp:»X6žijd R ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X6žijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X6žijdda K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X6žijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:»X6žijnna K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Use/Sub:»X6žijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X6žijgujn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»X6žij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žistti%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žijnni%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žijddás%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žijnni%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+A:»X6š%> ATTRCONT ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:»X6žit K ;
 :%> EABBUCASE1 ;
 :%> EABBUCASE2 ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:%>X8t K ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv+Use/Sub:%>X7t K ;
 +Use/Sub: ATTR  ;

LEXICON EABBUCASE1 !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom:X1 K ; ! 
 +Sg+Nom:X7 K ; ! 
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub: PxV ;
 +Ess:X1n K ;
 +Ess+Use/NG:X7n K ;
 +Ess+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X1n%> PxC ;
 +Ess+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X7n%> PxC ;

LEXICON EABBUCASE2 !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X6 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X6 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:j K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X2s%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/NG:X8s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:X8n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4st%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X8st%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:X5jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X5jn%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:X4k K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X5jd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X5jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X5jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X5jdasa%> PxV  ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjdasa%> PxV  ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X5jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:X5jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com:%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh+Use/Sub:X5j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%^DISIMPj%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X5jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjd%> PxPlComC ;

LEXICON EABBU_NVD !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom:»X6ž K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X6žin K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6ž%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen:»X6ža K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+Use/Sub:»X6ž K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6ž%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc:»X6ža K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+Use/Sub:»X6ž K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6ž%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X6žat K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žasa%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žijddá%> Px1V ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Ill:»X6žij K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc:»X6žis K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:»X6žin K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com:»X6žijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Use/Sub:»X6žijnna K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X6žijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+PlGenCmp:»X6žijd R ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X6žijd K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X6žijdda K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X6žijn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:»X6žijnna K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Use/Sub:»X6žijs K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X6žijgujn K ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»X6žij%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žistti%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žijnni%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žijddi%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žijddás%> PxC ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žijnni%> PxV ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:»X6žijddi%> PxPlComV1 ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+A:»X6š%> ATTRCONT ;
 +Der1+Der/Dimin+A+Der2+Der/at+Adv:»X6žit K ;
 :%> EABBUCASE1_NVD ;
 :%> EABBUCASE2_NVD ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:%>X8t K ;
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv+Use/Sub:%>X7t K ;
 +Attr+Use/Sub: ATTR  ;

LEXICON EABBUCASE1_NVD !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:X1 K ; ! 
 +Sg+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:X7 K ; ! 
 +Sg+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub: PxV ;
 +Ess:X1n K ;
 +Ess+Use/NG:X7n K ;
 +Ess+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X1n%> PxC ;
 +Ess+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X7n%> PxC ;

LEXICON EABBUCASE2_NVD !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Sg+Gen:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/NG:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X6 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Acc:X4 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/NG:X8 K ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X2 Px1V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X6 Px2V ;
 +Sg+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4 Px3V ;
 +Sg+Ill:X3j K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Sub:j K ;
 +Sg+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X2s%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc:X4s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/NG:X8s K ;
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:X4n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+South+Use/Sub:X8n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X4st%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X8st%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Sub:X5jn K ;
 +Sg+Com:%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X5jn%> PxC ;
 +Sg+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:X4t K ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Sub:X4k K ; ! !Skániid dialect
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X5jd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Nom+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjd%> Px1C ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Sub:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Gen:%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X5jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Gen+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Sub:X5jd K ;
 +Pl+Acc:%^DISIMPjd K ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X5jd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Acc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjd%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Sub:X5jde K ;
 +Pl+Ill:%^DISIMPjde K ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X5jdasa%> PxV  ;
 +Pl+Ill+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjdasa%> PxV  ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Sub:X5jn K ;
 +Pl+Loc:%^DISIMPjn K ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X5jn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Loc+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjn%> PxC ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Sub:X5jgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com:%^DISIMPjgujn K ;
 +Pl+Com/Sh+Use/Sub:X5j%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com/Sh:%^DISIMPj%- ENDLEX ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
 +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:X5jd%> PxPlComC ;
 +Pl+Com+Use/Marg+Use/Sub:%^DISIMPjd%> PxPlComC ;


LEXICON BU/MUS !!= * __@CODE@__
 +Comp:b BUStem ;
 +Superl:muss BUOREMUS ; 
 +Der2+Der/at+Adv:t K ;
